Nebraska, session 109, LB1193.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-518, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
13-518 For purposes of sections 13-518 to 13-522:
(1) Allowable growth means (a) for governmental units other than
community colleges, the percentage increase in taxable valuation in
excess of the base limitation established under section 77-3446, if any,
due to (i) improvements to real property as a result of new construction
and additions to existing buildings, (ii) any other improvements to real
property which increase the value of such property, (iii) any increase in
valuation due to annexation of real property by the governmental unit,
(iv) a change in the use of real property, (v) any increase in personal
property valuation over the prior year, and (vi) the accumulated excess
valuation over the redevelopment project valuation described in section
18-2147 of the Community Development Law for redevelopment projects
within the governmental unit in the year immediately after the division
of taxes for such redevelopment project has ended and (b) for community
colleges, the percentage increase in excess of the base limitation, if
any, in full-time equivalent students from the second year to the first
year preceding the year for which the budget is being determined;
(2) Capital improvements means (a) acquisition of real property or
(b) acquisition, construction, or extension of any improvements on real
property;
(3) Governing body has the same meaning as in section 13-503, except
that for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, such term shall
not include the governing body of any county, city, or village;
(4) Governmental unit means every political subdivision which has
authority to levy a property tax or authority to request levy authority
under section 77-3443, except that such term shall not include (a)
sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for five
years or less, (b) school districts, or (c) for fiscal years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025, counties, cities, or villages;
-2-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
(5) Qualified sinking fund means a fund or funds maintained
separately from the general fund to pay for acquisition or replacement of
tangible personal property with a useful life of five years or more which
is to be undertaken in the future but is to be paid for in part or in
total in advance using periodic payments into the fund. The term includes
sinking funds under subdivision (13) of section 35-508 for firefighting
and rescue equipment or apparatus;
(6) Restricted funds means (a) property tax, excluding any amounts
refunded to taxpayers, (b) payments in lieu of property taxes, (c) local
option sales taxes, (d) motor vehicle taxes, (e) state aid, (f) transfers
of surpluses from any user fee, permit fee, or regulatory fee if the fee
surplus is transferred to fund a service or function not directly related
to the fee and the costs of the activity funded from the fee, (g) any
funds excluded from restricted funds for the prior year because they were
budgeted for capital improvements but which were not spent and are not
expected to be spent for capital improvements, (h) the tax provided in
sections 77-27,223 to 77-27,227 beginning in the second fiscal year in
which the county will receive a full year of receipts, and (i) any excess
tax collections returned to the county under section 77-1776. Funds
received pursuant to the nameplate capacity tax levied under section
77-6203 for the first five years after a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource has been commissioned are
nonrestricted funds; and
(7) State aid means:
(a) For all governmental units, state aid paid pursuant to sections
60-3,202 and 77-3523 and reimbursement provided pursuant to section
77-1239;
(b) For municipalities, state aid to municipalities paid pursuant to
sections 39-2501 to 39-2520, 60-3,190, and 77-27,139.04 and insurance
premium tax paid to municipalities;
(c) For counties, state aid to counties paid pursuant to sections
-3-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
60-3,184 to 60-3,190, insurance premium tax paid to counties, and
reimbursements to counties from funds appropriated pursuant to section
29-3933;
(d) For community colleges, state aid to community colleges paid
pursuant to the Community College Aid Act;
(e) For educational service units, state aid appropriated under
sections 79-1241.01 and 79-1241.03; and
(f) For local public health departments as defined in section
71-1626, state aid as distributed under section 71-1628.08.
Sec. 2. Section 70-1001.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1001.01 For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1028.02 and
section 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Nebraska Power Review Board;
(2) Commercial electric vehicle charging station means equipment
designed to provide electricity for a fee for the charging of an electric
vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, including an electric
vehicle direct-current charger or a super-fast charger, any successor
technology, and all components thereof. Commercial electric vehicle
charging station does not include the residence of a person where an
electric vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle is charged if no
customer usage fee is charged;
(3) Commercial electric vehicle charging station operator means a
person, partnership, corporation, or other business entity or political
subdivision that operates a commercial electric vehicle charging station;
(4) Direct-current, fast-charging station means a publicly available
charging system capable of delivering at least fifty kilowatts of direct-
current electrical power to an electric vehicle's rechargeable battery at
a voltage of two hundred volts or greater;
(5) Direct-current, fast-charging station operator means a person,
partnership, corporation, or other business entity that operates a
-4-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
direct-current, fast-charging station open to the public. The term does
not include an electric supplier or a political subdivision;
(6) Electric supplier or supplier of electricity means any legal
entity supplying, producing, or distributing electricity within the state
for sale at wholesale or retail. Electric supplier does not include a
commercial electric vehicle charging station operator that is a private
person or privately owned partnership, privately owned corporation, or
other privately owned business;
(7) Electronic-related means relating to electronic devices,
circuits, or similar systems, or the components of such electronic
devices, circuits, or similar systems, that require electrical currents
or electromagnetism to operate;
(8) Foreign adversary means a foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15
C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on February 7, 2025;
(9) Military installation means:
(a) A United States Air Force ballistic missile silo located within
the geographic area described in 31 C.F.R. 802.211(b)(3), as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2025; or
(b) A United States Air Force base described in 31 C.F.R.
802.227(c), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(10) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle has the same meaning as in
section 60-345.01;
(11) Private electric supplier means an electric supplier producing
electricity from a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility that is not a public power district, a public power and
irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership
association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof. A
private electric supplier is limited to the development of those
facilities as provided in subdivision (12) of this section;
-5-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
(12) Privately developed renewable energy generation facility means
and is limited to a facility that (a) generates electricity using solar,
wind, geothermal, biomass, landfill gas, or biogas, including all
electrically connected equipment used to produce, collect, and store the
facility output up to and including the transformer that steps up the
voltage to sixty thousand volts or greater, and including supporting
structures, buildings, and roads, unless otherwise agreed to in a joint
transmission development agreement, (b) is developed, constructed, and
owned, in whole or in part, by one or more private electric suppliers,
and (c) is not wholly owned by a public power district, a public power
and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership
association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof;
(13) Regional transmission organization means an entity independent
from those entities generating or marketing electricity at wholesale or
retail, which has operational control over the electric transmission
lines in a designated geographic area in order to reduce constraints in
the flow of electricity and ensure that all power suppliers have open
access to transmission lines for the transmission of electricity;
(14) Reliable or reliability means the ability of an electric
supplier to supply the aggregate electric power and energy requirements
of its electricity consumers in Nebraska at all times under normal
operating conditions, taking into account scheduled and unscheduled
outages, including sudden disturbances or unanticipated loss of system
components that are to be reasonably expected for any electric utility
following prudent utility practices, recognizing certain weather
conditions and other contingencies may cause outages at the distribution,
transmission, and generation level;
(15) Representative organization means an organization designated by
the board and organized for the purpose of providing joint planning and
encouraging maximum cooperation and coordination among electric
-6-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
suppliers. Such organization shall represent electric suppliers owning a
combined electric generation plant accredited capacity of at least ninety
percent of the total electric generation plant accredited capacity
constructed and in operation within the state;
(16) State means the State of Nebraska; and
(17) Unbundled retail rates means the separation of utility bills
into the individual price components for which an electric supplier
charges its retail customers, including, but not limited to, the separate
charges for the generation, transmission, and distribution of
electricity.
Sec. 3. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a) The nameplate capacity tax established in 2010 has succeeded at
generating revenue for Nebraska residents based on the nameplate capacity
of privately developed renewable energy generation facilities;
(b) Privately developed energy storage resources can generate
similar tax revenue, support economic development in the state, and
strengthen the electric grid by improving capacity and reliability. These
benefits help all Nebraskans. It is the policy of the state to encourage
investment in the state and economic development; and
(c) To benefit the citizens of Nebraska, energy storage resources
should be subject to the nameplate capacity tax and protected from any
foreign adversary's control.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Associated energy storage resource means any energy storage
resource that is:
(i) Electrically connected to a privately developed renewable energy
generation facility;
(ii) Located on the same premises or in the immediate vicinity of
such facility;
(iii) Jointly owned or contractually affiliated with the facility;
(iv) Primarily intended to store the electric energy produced at the
-7-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
facility; and
(v) Rated in combination with all associated energy storage
resources of the facility and the facility itself at an aggregate
capacity no greater than the rated capacity of the facility;
(b)(i) Energy storage resource means a resource capable of:
(A) Receiving and transmitting electric energy to and from the
electrical grid or receiving electric energy from a generation resource
with which the energy storage resource is associated; and
(B) Storing electric energy for later injection of electric energy
into the electrical grid.
(ii) Energy storage resource does not include any device or
equipment intended solely to:
(A) Inject or absorb reactive power, including any capacitor and
synchronous condenser; or
(B) Provide power for electric vehicles;
(c) Scrutinized company has the same meaning as in section 73-903;
and
(d) Standalone energy storage resource means a publicly or privately
owned energy storage resource that is not an associated energy storage
resource.
(3)(a) A standalone energy storage resource shall be treated as an
electric generation facility that requires an application filed with and
is eligible for approval by the board pursuant to sections 70-1012 to
70-1016.
(b) The owner of a standalone energy storage resource, whether
publicly or privately owned, shall be treated as an electric supplier for
purposes of sections 70-1012 to 70-1016.
(c)(i) An associated energy storage resource shall be treated as
part of the privately developed renewable energy generation facility with
which the energy storage resource is associated for purposes of sections
70-1012 to 70-1016.
-8-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
(ii) If an associated energy storage resource is constructed or
installed after the construction of the privately developed renewable
energy generation facility with which the energy storage resource is
associated, then no less than thirty days prior to the commencement of
construction of the associated energy storage resource, the owner of the
associated energy storage resource shall provide notification and
certification to the board that satisfies the notification and
certification requirements of subdivision (2)(a) of section 70-1014.02
with respect to such resource.
(iii) Within ten days after receipt of such notification, the
executive director of the board shall issue a written acknowledgment that
the associated energy storage resource is part of the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility and is exempt from sections 70-1012
to 70-1014.01 if such facility remains in compliance with the
requirements of this section.
(iv) When a privately developed renewable energy generation facility
is decommissioned, the exemption from sections 70-1012 to 70-1014.01 for
all associated energy storage resources of the facility shall end.
(4) Property owned, used, or operated as part of an energy storage
resource shall not be subject to eminent domain by any consumer-owned
electric supplier operating in the State of Nebraska.
(5)(a) Any energy storage resource in the state shall comply with
the minimum codes and standards for energy storage resource equipment or
facilities in effect at the time of construction of the resource
established by the International Fire Code, as adopted and amended by the
State Fire Marshal, and National Fire Protection Association 855,
Standard for the Installation of Stationary Energy Storage Systems.
(b) Where a conflict exists between the International Fire Code and
National Fire Protection Association 855, Standard for the Installation
of Stationary Energy Storage Systems, National Fire Protection
Association 855, Standard for the Installation of Stationary Energy
-9-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
Storage Systems, shall control.
(6) Any energy storage resources in this state, other than energy
storage resources installed in single-family or two-family dwellings as
defined in National Fire Protection Association 855, Standard for the
Installation of Stationary Energy Storage Systems, shall have and
maintain, at an onsite location accessible to local first responders, a
site-specific emergency operations plan. The site-specific emergency
operations plan shall include:
(a) Identification of potential risks and hazards specific to the
site;
(b) Hazard mitigation measures;
(c) Procedures for the safe shutdown, deenergizing, or isolation of
equipment and systems under emergency conditions, including emergency
procedures to be followed in case of fire;
(d) Procedures for handling equipment damaged in a fire or other
emergency event;
(e) Procedures and schedules for conducting drills using the
procedures described in this subsection and documentation related to the
performance of the drills;
(f) Procedures for communication between the operator of the energy
storage resource and first responders, including procedures that
facilitate communication between first responders and emergency contacts
for the operator; and
(g) Emergency operations protocols to ensure safety during critical
events, including protocols that provide for the safety of nearby
residents, neighboring properties, first responders, and the environment,
and measures to mitigate or prevent pollution of air, soil, groundwater,
and surface water.
(7) Before an energy storage resource commences operation, its owner
shall provide the site-specific emergency operations plan of the resource
to the local agency that is responsible for providing fire protection
-10-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
services in the area.
(8) Every energy storage resource owner in the state shall offer to
local first responders, at no cost to the responders, education and
annual training regarding responding to an equipment failure incident at
the energy storage resource. The training shall include:
(a) Information on specific characteristics of energy storage
resource technology;
(b) Information on protecting first responders during an equipment
failure incident;
(c) Information on hazards commonly associated with an equipment
failure incident;
(d) Information on equipment failure incident response protocols,
including an overview of the site-specific emergency operations plan
developed under subsection (6) of this section; and
(e) An onsite review of the perimeter, major equipment, ingress, and
egress of the energy storage resource.
(9) Unless expressly authorized by state law, no entity with
authority to regulate an energy storage resource, including a
municipality, shall adopt, enforce, or maintain any safety standard or
testing requirement for energy storage resources that is different from
those set forth in sections 70-1001 to 70-1028.02.
(10) A scrutinized company shall not own or operate an energy
storage resource in the state.
Sec. 4. Section 77-105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-105 The term tangible personal property includes all personal
property possessing a physical existence, excluding money. The term
tangible personal property also includes trade fixtures, which means
machinery and equipment, regardless of the degree of attachment to real
property, used directly in commercial, manufacturing, or processing
activities conducted on real property, regardless of whether the real
-11-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
property is owned or leased, and all depreciable tangible personal
property described in subsection (9) of section 77-202 used in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source or in the storage of such electricity in an energy
storage resource as defined in section 3 of this act or as an energy
storage resource as defined in section 3 of this act. The term intangible
personal property includes all other personal property, including money.
Sec. 5. Section 77-202, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-202 (1) The following property shall be exempt from property
taxes:
(a) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions to the
extent used or being developed for use by the state or governmental
subdivision for a public purpose. For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions means
(A) property held in fee title by the state or a governmental subdivision
or (B) property beneficially owned by the state or a governmental
subdivision in that it is used for a public purpose and is being acquired
under a lease-purchase agreement, financing lease, or other instrument
which provides for transfer of legal title to the property to the state
or a governmental subdivision upon payment of all amounts due thereunder.
If the property to be beneficially owned by a governmental subdivision
has a total acquisition cost that exceeds the threshold amount or will be
used as the site of a public building with a total estimated construction
cost that exceeds the threshold amount, then such property shall qualify
for an exemption under this section only if the question of acquiring
such property or constructing such public building has been submitted at
a primary, general, or special election held within the governmental
subdivision and has been approved by the voters of the governmental
subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, threshold amount means the
greater of fifty thousand dollars or six-tenths of one percent of the
-12-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
total actual value of real and personal property of the governmental
subdivision that will beneficially own the property as of the end of the
governmental subdivision's prior fiscal year; and
(ii) Public purpose means use of the property (A) to provide public
services with or without cost to the recipient, including the general
operation of government, public education, public safety, transportation,
public works, civil and criminal justice, public health and welfare,
developments by a public housing authority, parks, culture, recreation,
community development, and cemetery purposes, or (B) to carry out the
duties and responsibilities conferred by law with or without
consideration. Public purpose does not include leasing of property to a
private party unless the lease of the property is at fair market value
for a public purpose. Leases of property by a public housing authority to
low-income individuals as a place of residence are for the authority's
public purpose;
(b) Unleased property of the state or its governmental subdivisions
which is not being used or developed for use for a public purpose but
upon which a payment in lieu of taxes is paid for public safety, rescue,
and emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services to all governmental units providing such services to the
property. Except as provided in Article VIII, section 11, of the
Constitution of Nebraska, the payment in lieu of taxes shall be based on
the proportionate share of the cost of providing public safety, rescue,
or emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services unless a general policy is adopted by the governing body of the
governmental subdivision providing such services which provides for a
different method of determining the amount of the payment in lieu of
taxes. The governing body may adopt a general policy by ordinance or
resolution for determining the amount of payment in lieu of taxes by
majority vote after a hearing on the ordinance or resolution. Such
ordinance or resolution shall nevertheless result in an equitable
-13-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
contribution for the cost of providing such services to the exempt
property;
(c) Property owned by and used exclusively for agricultural and
horticultural societies;
(d)(i) Property owned by educational, religious, charitable, or
cemetery organizations, or any organization for the exclusive benefit of
any such educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery organization,
and used exclusively for educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery
purposes, when such property is not (A) owned or used for financial gain
or profit to either the owner or user, (B) used for the sale of alcoholic
liquors for more than twenty hours per week, or (C) owned or used by an
organization which discriminates in membership or employment based on
race, color, or national origin.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (1)(d) of this section:
(A) Educational organization means (I) an institution operated
exclusively for the purpose of offering regular courses with systematic
instruction in academic, vocational, or technical subjects or assisting
students through services relating to the origination, processing, or
guarantying of federally reinsured student loans for higher education,
(II) a museum or historical society operated exclusively for the benefit
and education of the public, or (III) a nonprofit organization that owns
or operates a child care facility; and
(B) Charitable organization includes (I) an organization operated
exclusively for the purpose of the mental, social, or physical benefit of
the public or an indefinite number of persons and (II) a fraternal
benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to
44-10,109.
(iii) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to any for-profit skilled nursing facility,
for-profit nursing facility, or for-profit assisted-living facility that
provides housing for medicaid beneficiaries, except that the exemption
-14-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
amount for such property shall be a percentage of the property taxes that
would otherwise be due. Such percentage shall be equal to the average
percentage of occupied beds in the facility provided to medicaid
beneficiaries over the most recent three-year period. This subdivision
shall not be construed to modify, limit, or reduce any property tax
exemption provided to a nonprofit skilled nursing facility, nonprofit
nursing facility, or nonprofit assisted-living facility pursuant to
subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section. For purposes of this subdivision,
skilled nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-429,
nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-424, and assisted-
living facility has the same meaning as in section 71-5903.
(iv) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to a building that (A) is owned by a
charitable organization, (B) is made available to students in attendance
at an educational institution, and (C) is recognized by such educational
institution as approved student housing, except that the exemption shall
only apply to the commons area of such building, including any common
rooms and cooking and eating facilities;
(e) Household goods and personal effects not owned or used for
financial gain or profit to either the owner or user; and
(f) A portion of the property owned by a taxpayer as provided in the
Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
(2) The increased value of land by reason of shade and ornamental
trees planted along the highway shall not be taken into account in the
valuation of land.
(3) Tangible personal property which is not depreciable tangible
personal property as defined in section 77-119 shall be exempt from
property tax.
(4) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers required to be
registered for operation on the highways of this state shall be exempt
from payment of property taxes.
-15-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
(5) Business and agricultural inventory shall be exempt from the
personal property tax. For purposes of this subsection, business
inventory includes personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain only if the personal
property is of a type which in the ordinary course of business is leased
or rented thirty days or less and may be returned at the option of the
lessee or renter at any time and the personal property is of a type which
would be considered household goods or personal effects if owned by an
individual. All other personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain shall not be
considered business inventory.
(6) Any personal property exempt pursuant to subsection (2) of
section 77-4105 or section 77-5209.02 shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(7) Livestock shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(8) Any personal property exempt pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage
Act or the ImagiNE Nebraska Act shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(9) Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind as the fuel source or in the storage
of such electricity in an energy storage resource as defined in section 3
of this act shall be exempt from the property tax levied on depreciable
tangible personal property. Any depreciable tangible personal property
used directly in the generation of electricity using solar, biomass, or
landfill gas as the fuel source or in the storage of such electricity in
an energy storage resource as defined in section 3 of this act shall be
exempt from the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal
property if such depreciable tangible personal property was installed on
or after January 1, 2016, and has a nameplate capacity of one hundred
kilowatts or more. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027,
any depreciable tangible personal property used as an energy storage
-16-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
resource as defined in section 3 of this act shall be exempt from the
property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property if such
depreciable tangible personal property has a nameplate capacity of one
hundred kilowatts or more. Depreciable tangible personal property used
directly in the generation or storage of electricity using wind, solar,
biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source includes, but is not limited
to, wind turbines, rotors and blades, towers, solar panels, trackers,
generating equipment, transmission components, substations, supporting
structures or racks, inverters, and other system components such as
wiring, control systems, switchgears, and generator step-up transformers,
battery modules, battery racks, power conversion systems, battery
enclosures, battery cells, and battery management systems.
(10) Any tangible personal property that is acquired by a person
operating a data center located in this state, that is assembled,
engineered, processed, fabricated, manufactured into, attached to, or
incorporated into other tangible personal property, both in component
form or that of an assembled product, for the purpose of subsequent use
at a physical location outside this state by the person operating a data
center shall be exempt from the personal property tax. Such exemption
extends to keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power over
tangible personal property in this state for the purpose of subsequently
transporting it outside this state for use thereafter outside this state.
For purposes of this subsection, data center means computers, supporting
equipment, and other organized assembly of hardware or software that are
designed to centralize the storage, management, or dissemination of data
and information, environmentally controlled structures or facilities or
interrelated structures or facilities that provide the infrastructure for
housing the equipment, such as raised flooring, electricity supply,
communication and data lines, Internet access, cooling, security, and
fire suppression, and any building housing the foregoing.
(11) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each person who owns
-17-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
property required to be reported to the county assessor under section
77-1201 shall be allowed an exemption amount as provided in the Personal
Property Tax Relief Act. For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each
person who owns property required to be valued by the state as provided
in section 77-601, 77-682, 77-801, or 77-1248 shall be allowed a
compensating exemption factor as provided in the Personal Property Tax
Relief Act.
(12)(a) Broadband equipment shall be exempt from the personal
property tax if such broadband equipment is:
(i) Deployed in an area funded in whole or in part by funds from the
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, authorized by the
federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58; or
(ii) Deployed in a qualified census tract located within the
corporate limits of a city of the metropolitan class and being utilized
to provide end-users with access to the Internet at speeds of at least
one hundred megabits per second for downloading and at least one hundred
megabits per second for uploading.
(b) An owner of broadband equipment seeking an exemption under this
section shall apply for an exemption to the county assessor on or before
December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is to
begin. If the broadband equipment meets the criteria described in this
subsection, the county assessor shall approve the application within
thirty calendar days after receiving the application. The application
shall be on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Broadband communications service means telecommunications
service as defined in section 86-121, video programming as defined in 47
U.S.C. 522, as such section existed on January 1, 2024, or Internet
access as defined in section 1104 of the federal Internet Tax Freedom
Act, Public Law 105-277;
(ii) Broadband equipment means machinery or equipment used to
-18-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
provide broadband communications service and includes, but is not limited
to, wires, cables, fiber, conduits, antennas, poles, switches, routers,
amplifiers, rectifiers, repeaters, receivers, multiplexers, duplexers,
transmitters, circuit cards, insulating and protective materials and
cases, power equipment, backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment,
storage devices, modems, and other general central office or headend
equipment, such as channel cards, frames, and cabinets, or equipment used
in successor technologies, including items used to monitor, test,
maintain, enable, or facilitate qualifying equipment, machinery,
software, ancillary components, appurtenances, accessories, or other
infrastructure that is used in whole or in part to provide broadband
communications service. Machinery or equipment used to produce broadband
communications service does not include personal consumer electronics,
including, but not limited to, smartphones, computers, and tablets; and
(iii) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as
defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on
January 1, 2024.
Sec. 6. Section 77-6201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-6201 The Legislature finds and declares:
(1) The purpose of the nameplate capacity tax levied under section
77-6203 is to replace property taxes currently imposed on renewable
energy and energy storage infrastructure and depreciated over a short
period of time in a way that causes local budgeting challenges and
increases upfront costs for renewable energy developers;
(2) The nameplate capacity tax should be competitive with taxes
imposed directly and indirectly on renewable energy generation, storage,
and development in other states;
(3) The nameplate capacity tax should be fair and nondiscriminatory
when compared with other taxes imposed on other industries in the state;
and
-19-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
(4) The nameplate capacity tax should not be singled out as a source
of General Fund revenue during times of economic hardship.
Sec. 7. Section 77-6202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6202 For purposes of sections 77-6201 to 77-6204:
(1) Commissioned means the renewable energy generation facility or
energy storage resource has been in commercial operation for at least
twenty-four hours. A renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource is not in commercial operation unless the renewable
energy generation facility or energy storage resource is connected and
transmitting energy to the electrical grid, to an associated renewable
energy generation facility, or to the end user if the renewable energy
generation facility is a customer-generator as defined in section
70-2002;
(2) Energy storage resource has the same meaning as in section 3 of
this act;
(3) (2) Nameplate capacity means the capacity of (a) a renewable
energy generation facility to generate electricity as measured in
megawatts, including fractions of a megawatt, or (b) an energy storage
resource to store electricity as measured in megawatts, including
fractions of a megawatt. Nameplate capacity shall be determined based on
the facility's alternating current capacity of the facility or resource;
and
(4) (3) Renewable energy generation facility means (a) a facility
that generates electricity using wind as the fuel source or (b) a
facility that generates electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas
as the fuel source if such facility was installed on or after January 1,
2016, and has a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more.
Sec. 8. Section 77-6203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6203 (1)(a) (1) The owner of a renewable energy generation
-20-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
facility annually shall pay a nameplate capacity tax equal to the total
nameplate capacity of the commissioned renewable energy generation
facility multiplied by a tax rate of three thousand five hundred eighteen
dollars per megawatt.
(b) The owner of an energy storage resource annually shall pay a
nameplate capacity tax equal to the total nameplate capacity of the
commissioned energy storage resource multiplied by a tax rate of two
thousand nine hundred fifty-two dollars per megawatt.
(2) No tax shall be imposed on a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource:
(a) Owned or operated by the federal government, the State of
Nebraska, a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an individual municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric membership association, or a cooperative; or
(b) That is a customer-generator as defined in section 70-2002.
(3) No tax levied pursuant to this section shall be construed to
constitute restricted funds as defined in section 13-518 for the first
five years after the renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource is commissioned.
(4) Not withstanding any other law to the contrary, the The presence
of one or more renewable energy generation facilities, energy storage
resources, or supporting infrastructure shall not be a factor in the
assessment, determination of actual value, or classification under
section 77-201 of the real property underlying or adjacent to such
facilities, resources, or infrastructure.
(5)(a)(i) On or before March 1 of each year, the owner of a
renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource subject
to the nameplate capacity tax shall file a report with the county
treasurer of each county in which the facility or resource is located and
provide a copy of such report to the Department of Revenue.
(ii) The report shall state the nameplate capacity of the facility
-21-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
or resource for the prior calendar year from January 1 through December
31 and shall be on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue.
(b) Upon receipt of the report filed pursuant to subdivision (5)(a)
of this section, the county treasurer shall calculate the amount of the
nameplate capacity tax based on the reported nameplate capacity and the
tax rate provided in subsection (1) of this section. The county treasurer
shall, prior to April 1 of each year, notify the owner of the amount of
tax due and the date such tax is due.
(c) The Department of Revenue shall review all reports filed
pursuant to subdivision (5)(a) of this section for accuracy, consistency,
and compliance with this section. The Department of Revenue may audit
facilities as necessary to verify reported nameplate capacity. (5)(a) The
Department of Revenue shall collect the tax due under this section.
(d) (b) The tax shall be imposed beginning the first calendar year
the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource is
commissioned. A renewable energy generation facility that uses wind as
the fuel source which was commissioned prior to July 15, 2010, shall be
subject to the tax levied pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 on and
after January 1, 2010. The amount of property tax on depreciable tangible
personal property previously paid on a renewable energy generation
facility that uses wind as the fuel source which was commissioned prior
to July 15, 2010, which is greater than the amount that would have been
paid pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 from the date of
commissioning until January 1, 2010, shall be credited against any tax
due under Chapter 77, and any amount so credited that is unused in any
tax year shall be carried over to subsequent tax years until fully
utilized. Beginning January 1, 2027, energy storage resources shall be
subject to the tax levied pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204. The
amount of property tax on depreciable tangible personal property that an
energy storage resource incurred before January 1, 2027, shall be
credited against any tax the resource incurs under Chapter 77 on or after
-22-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
January 1, 2027, and any amount so credited that is unused in any tax
year shall be carried over to subsequent tax years until fully utilized.
(e)(i) (c)(i) The tax for the first calendar year shall be prorated
based upon the number of days remaining in the calendar year after the
renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource is
commissioned.
(ii) In the first year in which a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource is taxed or in any year in which
additional commissioned nameplate capacity is added to a renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource, the taxes on the initial
or additional nameplate capacity shall be prorated for the number of days
remaining in the calendar year.
(iii) When a renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource is decommissioned or made nonoperational by a change in law
during a tax year, the taxes shall be prorated for the number of days
during which the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource was not decommissioned or was operational.
(iv) When the capacity of a renewable energy generation facility or
energy storage resource to produce or store electricity is reduced but
the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource is
not decommissioned, the nameplate capacity of the renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource is deemed to be unchanged.
(6)(a) On March 1 of each year, the owner of a renewable energy
generation facility shall file with the Department of Revenue a report on
the nameplate capacity of the facility for the previous year from January
1 through December 31. All taxes imposed pursuant to sections 77-6201 to
77-6204 shall be due on April 1 and shall be delinquent if not paid to
the county treasurer of each county in which the renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource is located. on a quarterly
basis on April 1 and each quarter thereafter. Delinquent quarterly
payments shall draw interest at the rate provided for in section
-23-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted.
(b) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource is liable for the taxes under this section with respect
to the facility or resource, whether or not the owner of the facility or
resource is the owner of the land on which the facility or resource is
situated.
(7) Failure to file a report required by subsection (6) of this
section, filing such report late, failure to pay taxes due, or
underpayment of such taxes shall result in a penalty of five percent of
the amount due being imposed for each quarter the report is overdue or
the payment is delinquent, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten
thousand dollars.
(8) The Department of Revenue shall enforce the provisions of this
section. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to:
(a) Prescribe the form and content of reports required under
subsection (5) of this section;
(b) Establish audit procedures and standards for verifying nameplate
capacity reported under subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Ensure consistent calculation and collection of the nameplate
capacity tax across all counties; and
(d) Establish procedures for assessing penalties authorized under
subsection (7) of this section for failure to file required reports, late
filing, failure to pay taxes due, or underpayment of taxes. necessary for
the implementation and enforcement of this section.
(9) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue received
pursuant to this section as provided in section 77-6204 within thirty
days after receipt of such revenue. The Department of Revenue shall
separately identify the proceeds from the tax imposed by this section and
shall pay all such proceeds over to the county treasurer of the county
where the renewable energy generation facility is located within thirty
-24-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
days after receipt of such proceeds.
(10) Each county treasurer shall report annually to the Department
of Revenue the total amount of nameplate capacity tax collected under
this section for audit and verification purposes.
Sec. 9. Section 77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-6204 (1)(a) (1) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue
received from taxes levied prior to January 1, 2027, the Department of
Revenue pursuant to section 77-6203 as follows:
(i) (a) Five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
community college area in which the renewable energy generation facility
is located; and
(ii) (b) The remainder of such revenue shall be distributed to local
taxing entities which, but for such personal property tax exemption,
would have received distribution of personal property tax revenue from
depreciable personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel
source.
(b) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue from taxes
levied on or after January 1, 2027, pursuant to section 77-6203 as
follows:
(i) Ninety-five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
counties in proportion to the amount of tax paid by renewable energy
generation facilities or energy storage resources physically located in
each county. If the facility or resource is located entirely within one
county, all such revenue from the tax paid by such facility or resource
shall be distributed to that county. If the facility or resource is
located in more than one county, the revenue from the tax paid by such
facility or resource shall be apportioned among such counties in
proportion to the amount of nameplate capacity of the facility or
resource that is physically located within each county's boundaries;
-25-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
(ii) Five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
community college areas, as defined in section 85-1503, in proportion to
the amount of tax paid by renewable energy generation facilities or
energy storage resources physically located in each community college
area. If the facility or resource is located entirely within one
community college area, all such revenue from the tax paid by such
facility or resource shall be distributed to that community college area.
If the facility or resource is located in more than one community college
area, the revenue from the tax paid by such facility or resource shall be
apportioned among such community college areas in proportion to the
amount of nameplate capacity of the facility or resource that is
physically located within each community college area's boundaries.
(2) A local taxing entity's status as eligible for distribution
under subdivision (1)(a)(ii) (1)(b) of this section shall not be affected
when and if the net book value of personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source becomes zero. A local taxing entity's status as eligible
for distribution under such subdivision shall be affected by the disposal
of all of the exempt depreciable personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source.
(3) The distribution to each eligible local taxing entity under
subdivision (1)(a)(ii) (1)(b) of this section shall be calculated by
determining the amount of taxes that the eligible local taxing entity
levied during the taxable year and dividing this amount by the total tax
levied by all of the eligible local taxing entities during the year. Each
eligible entity's resulting fraction shall then be multiplied by the
amount of revenue available for distribution pursuant to subdivision (1)
(a)(ii) (1)(b) of this section to determine the portion of such revenue
due each local taxing entity.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall not retain any revenue collected
-26-

LB1193 LB1193
2026 2026
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 for distribution, use, transfer,
pledge, or allocation to or from the General Fund.
(5) Each county treasurer shall report annually to the Department of
Revenue the distribution of revenue under this section for audit and
verification purposes.
(6) For purposes of this section, the physical location of nameplate
capacity of a renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource shall be determined as follows:
(a) For wind energy generation facilities, by the location of each
wind turbine structure;
(b) For solar energy generation facilities, by the location of each
solar panel array; and
(c) For energy storage resources, by the location of each energy
storage container.
Sec. 10. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 11. Original sections 77-105 and 77-6201, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, sections 77-6202 and 77-6203, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 13-518, 70-1001.01, 77-202, and
77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-27-